Washington statutes.
RCW 28A.535.010

Authority to validate indebtedness.

Any school district may validate and ratify the indebtedness of such school district, incurred for strictly school purposes, when the same together with all then outstanding legal indebtedness does not exceed that amount permitted for school districts in RCW 39.36.020 (1) and (3). The value of taxable property in such school district shall be ascertained as provided in Article eight, section six, Amendment 27, of the Constitution of the state of Washington.

[ 1969 ex.s. c 223 s 28A.52.010. Prior: 1909 c 97 p 331 s 1; RRS s 4956; prior: 1897 c 118 s 128; 1895 c 21 s 1. Formerly RCW 28A.52.010, 28.52.010.]

NOTES:

Reviser's note: The above reference to RCW 39.36.020 (1) and (3) was apparently based upon the 1967 version of that section [1967 c 107 s 4]; the contents and organization of that section have been altered by subsequent amendments.